Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 4 Foreign Conservatorships

29-5-135.
“Foreign conservator” defined; sale or disposal of property.

For purposes of this part, the term “foreign conservator” means a conservator or other person who has been given responsibility by a court of competent jurisdiction in another state or territory governed by the Constitution of the United States for the care of the property of an incapacitated adult, referred to as the ward, and whose conservatorship has not been transferred to and accepted in this state pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title.

Any foreign conservator of a ward who resides in any other state and who is authorized to sell and convey property of the ward may sell property of the ward which is in this state, under the rules and regulations prescribed for the sale of real estate by conservators of this state, provided that the foreign conservator must file and have recorded in the court or other proper court, at the time of petitioning for sale, an authenticated copy of the letters of appointment and must also file with the court or other proper authority bond with good and sufficient security, in double the value of the property to be sold, for the faithful execution of the conservatorship as provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-135

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 5/HB 954.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title” for “Part 2 of this article” at the end of subsection (a).

29-5-136.
Conservator’s power to bring suit.

A foreign conservator may institute an action in any court in this state to enforce any right or to recover any property belonging to the ward or accruing to the foreign conservator in his or her capacity as conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-136

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-137.
Filing of letters of conservatorship with court.

Pending an action brought by a foreign conservator pursuant to Code Section 29-5-136, an authenticated copy of the letters of conservatorship shall be filed with the clerk of the court to become a part of the record, if the case is pending in a court of record, or filed with the papers, if the action is a summary proceeding.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-137

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-138.
Submission to jurisdiction personally of foreign conservator; registration of conservatorship.

A foreign conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in any proceeding relating to the conservatorship by:

Receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property in this state belonging to the ward;

Doing any act as a conservator in this state that would have given this state jurisdiction over the actor as an individual; or

Registering the conservatorship order in this state pursuant to Code Section 29-11-31.

With respect to a conservatorship order from another state that has been registered with and recorded by a court of this state under Code Section 29-11-31, in addition to any action such court of this state may take under this part or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-32, such court of this state may communicate with the appointing court in such other state under subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-4 to inform such appointing court of any proceeding relating to the conservatorship initiated in this state under subsection (a) of this Code section, stating the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-138

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 22/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (a)(1); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2); added paragraph (a)(3); and added subsection (b).

29-5-139.
Interested parties’ right to compel foreign conservator to act with equity and good conscience; court’s communication with appointing foreign court.

Any resident of this state who is interested as a creditor, heir, putative heir, or will beneficiary of a ward for whom a foreign conservator has been appointed may apply to the proper court to compel the foreign conservator to protect that interest according to equity and good conscience before selling the ward’s assets or removing the ward’s assets beyond the limits of this state.

With respect to a conservatorship order from another state that has been registered with and recorded by a court of this state under Code Section 29-11-31, in addition to any action such court of this state may take under this part or under subsection (b) of Code Section 29-11-32, such court of this state may communicate with the appointing court in such other state under subsection (a) of Code Section 29-11-4 to inform such appointing court of the application to compel such foreign conservator to protect an interest under subsection (a) of this Code section, stating the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-139

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 23/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a), and, in subsection (a), inserted “putative heir,” near the middle, substituted “for whom a foreign conservator has been appointed” for “whom a foreign conservator represents” in the middle; and added subsection (b).

29-5-140.
Payments to foreign conservator on debts or return of property belonging to ward.

A person who is indebted to or has possession of tangible or intangible property of a ward may pay the debt or deliver the property to a foreign conservator of the ward. Payment of the debt or delivery of the property may be made upon proof of appointment and proof that the foreign conservator has been appointed and is entitled to debt payment or to receive delivery of the property.

Payment of the debt or delivery of the property in response to the demand discharges the debtor or possessor, unless the debtor or possessor has knowledge of proceedings for the appointment of a guardian, conservator, or other protective proceeding in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.